District of Columbia statutes.
38-1805.50

Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter —

(1)

The term “facilities” means buildings, structures, and real property of the District of Columbia public schools, except that such term does not include any administrative office building that is not located in a building containing classrooms; and

(2)

The term “repair and improvement” includes administration, construction, and renovation.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [261], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2550

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.50.